Arkansas, session 2025, SB497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 2, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
11-2-126. Posting of veterans' benefits and services.
(a)(1) The Department of Labor and Licensing, in consultation with the
Department of Veterans Affairs, shall create and distribute a veterans'
benefits and services poster to employers.
(2) The poster created under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall include without limitation the following information:
(A) Contact and website information for the Department of
Veterans Affairs programs and services;
(B) Substance abuse and mental health treatment options;
(C) Educational, workforce, and training resources;
(D) Tax benefits;
(E) The availability of a veteran's designation on a
*CRH218*
03/18/2025 8:40:05 AM CRH218

SB497
driver's license or an identification card;
(F) Eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits under
state and federal law;
(G) Legal services; and
(H) Contact information for the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs Veterans Crisis Line.
(b) An employer in the state with fifty (50) or more full-time
equivalent employees shall display the poster created under this section in a
conspicuous place accessible to employees in the employer's workplace.



























03/18/2025 8:40:05 AM CRH218